Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 13

Duties of Railroads to Passengers
[Repealed]

65-13-101 — 65-13-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§ 65-13-101 — 65-13-110 (Acts 1865-1866, ch. 15, §§ 1-5; 1887, ch. 225, §§ 1-4; 1899, ch. 211, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 3065-3073, 3076a1-3076a3; Code 1932, §§ 5509-5517, 5521-5523; T.C.A.(orig. ed.), §§ 65-1301 — 65-1312; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning duties of railroads to passengers, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 39, § 3.